Utah statutes.
31A-22-1805.   Employees and authorized representatives of a vendor.

(1)  An employee or authorized representative of a vendor may sell or offer portable electronics insurance to a customer and is not subject to licensure as an insurance producer under this title if:

(a)  the vendor obtains a portable electronics limited lines license that authorizes the vendor's employee or authorized representative to sell or offer portable electronics insurance pursuant to this section;

(b)  the insurer issuing the portable electronics insurance either directly supervises or appoints a supervising entity to supervise the administration of the portable electronics insurance program, including development of a training program for each employee or authorized representative of the vendor that complies with the following:

(i)  the training shall be delivered to an employee or authorized representative of a vendor who is directly engaged in the activity of selling or offering portable electronics insurance;

(ii)  the training may be provided in electronic form if the supervising entity implements a supplemental education program regarding the portable electronics insurance product that is conducted and overseen by a licensed employee of the supervising entity that holds a portable electronics limited lines producer license; and

(iii)  each employee and authorized representative shall receive basic instruction about the portable electronics insurance offered to customers and the disclosures required under Section 31A-22-1807; and

(c)  an employee or authorized representative of a vendor of portable electronics may not advertise, represent, or otherwise hold the individual out as an insurance producer of any type.

(2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an employee or authorized representative of a vendor of portable electronics may not be compensated based primarily on the number of customers enrolled for portable electronics insurance coverage, but may receive compensation for activities under the limited lines license that are incidental to the employee's or authorized representative's overall compensation.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2012 General Session

